District of Columbia statutes.
34-1671.04

Consent to District of Columbia jurisdiction.

Any licensee or other person who knowingly engages in business activities that are regulated under this chapter, with or without filing an application, is deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the Commission and the courts of the District of Columbia, for an action arising under this chapter.

History

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 5, 51 DCR 10549